th: ประเภทเฟเดอร์: โพลาไรเซชันเชิงเส้น; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยมอเตอร์; ไม่มี; โรตารี; แบบปุ่มสัมผัส; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de fader: Linear; Motorizado; Nenhum; Rotativo; Sensível ao toque; Outro
fr: Type de fader: Linéaire; Motorisé; Aucune; Rotatif; Tactile; Autre
ko: 페이더 유형: 선형; 전동식; 없음; 회전; 터치 감지; 기타
sl-SI: Tip drsnika: Linearna; Motorizirano; Brez; Krožna; Občutljivo na dotik; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip fader: Liniar; Motorizată; Niciuna; Rotativă; Sensibilă la atingere; Altele
de: Fader-Typ: Linear; Motorisiert; Keine; Rotierend; Berührungsempfindlich; Sonstiges
nb: Fader type: Lineær; Motorisert; Ingen; Roterende; Berøringsfølsom; Annet
en: Fader type: Linear; Motorized; None; Rotary; Touch-sensitive; Other
ja: フェーダータイプ: 線型; モーター付き; なし; ロータリー; タッチセンサー式; その他
it: Tipo di fader: Lineare; Motorizzato; Nessuna; A rotazione; Sensibile al tocco; Altro
el: Τύπος fader: Γραμμικός; Μηχανοκίνητος; Καμία; Περιστροφικός; Ευαίσθητο στην αφή; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ zoslabovača: Lineárny; Motorizovaný; Žiadny; Rotačný; Citlivý na dotyk; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta klizača: Linearna; Motorizirano; Nema; Rotacija; Osjetljiva na dodir; Ostalo
cs: Typ faderu: Lineární; Motorizované; Žádný; Rotační; Citlivá na dotek; Jiné
hu: Halványítótípus: Lineáris; Motoros; Egyik sem; Forgó; Érintésérzékeny; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип фейдър: Линейна; Моторизиран; Няма; Ротационно; Чувствителна на допир; Други
da: Fader-type: Lineær; Motoriseret; Ingen; Roterende; Berøringsfølsom; Andet
es: Tipo de fader: Lineal; Motorizado; Ninguno; Giratoria; Táctil; Otros
nl: Fader type: Lineair; Gemotoriseerd; Geen; Roterend; Aanraakgevoelig; Andere
fi: Liukukytkimen tyyppi: Lineaarinen; Motorisoitu; Ei mitään; Pyörivä; Kosketusherkkä; Muu
lt-LT: Faderio tipas: Linijinis; Motorizuotas; Nėra; Rotacinis; Lietimui jautri; Kita
tr: Fader tipi: Doğrusal; Motorlu; Hiçbiri; Döner; Dokunmaya duyarlı; Diğer
zh-TW: 推桿類型: 線性; 機動化; 無; 旋轉; 紫外線敏感; 其他
vi: Loại fader: Tuyến tính; Gắn động cơ; Không có; Xoay; Cảm ứng nhạy; Khác
pl: Typ tłumika: Liniowy; Napęd silnikowy; Brak; Rotacyjny; Ekran dotykowy; Inne
sv: Fadertyp: Linjär; Motoriserad; Inga; Roterande; Tryckkänsligt; Övrigt
ru: Тип фейдера: Линейная; Моторизованный; Нет; Поворотный; Сенсорная; Другой
pt-BR: Tipo de fader: Linear; Motorizado; Nenhum; Rotativo; Sensível ao toque; Outro
zh-CN: 推子类型: 线性; 机动; 无; 旋转型; 触摸敏感式; 其他